New York, session 2025-2026, A8171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 399-s of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by 2 section 3 of part ZZ of chapter 58 of the laws of 2020, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 399-s. Pilot program scope and duration. The commissioner shall 5 conduct a pilot program designed to evaluate utilizing the internet for 6 delivering an approved pre-licensing course required by subparagraph (i) 7 of paragraph (a) of subdivision four of section five hundred two of this 8 chapter, by permitting qualified applicants to participate in the pilot 9 program from June thirtieth, two thousand twenty to June thirtieth, two 10 thousand [twenty-five] thirty. [Provided that applicants for class DJ 11 and class MJ licenses shall not be eligible to participate in such pilot 12 program.] 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 14 the amendments to section 399-s of the vehicle and traffic law made by 15 section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and 16 shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11396-01-5